Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE B. DRIVER'S LICENSES AND PERSONAL IDENTIFICATION CARDS

CHAPTER 524. ADMINISTRATIVE SUSPENSION OF DRIVER'S LICENSE FOR FAILURE TO PASS TEST FOR INTOXICATION

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 524.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Adult" means an individual 21 years of age or older.

(2) "Alcohol concentration" has the meaning assigned by Section 49.01, Penal Code.

(3) "Alcohol-related or drug-related enforcement contact" means a driver's license suspension, disqualification, or prohibition order under the laws of this state or another state resulting from:

(A) a conviction of an offense prohibiting the operation of a motor vehicle or watercraft while:

(i) intoxicated;

(ii) under the influence of alcohol; or

(iii) under the influence of a controlled substance;

(B) a refusal to submit to the taking of a breath or blood specimen following an arrest for an offense prohibiting the operation of a motor vehicle or an offense prohibiting the operation of a watercraft, if the watercraft was powered with an engine having a manufacturer's rating of 50 horsepower or more, while:

(i) intoxicated;

(ii) under the influence of alcohol; or

(iii) under the influence of a controlled substance; or

(C) an analysis of a breath or blood specimen showing an alcohol concentration of a level specified by Section 49.01, Penal Code, following an arrest for an offense prohibiting the operation of a motor vehicle or watercraft while intoxicated.

(4) "Arrest" includes the taking into custody of a child, as defined by Section 51.02, Family Code.

(5) "Conviction" includes an adjudication under Title 3, Family Code.

(6) "Criminal charge" includes a charge that may result in a proceeding under Title 3, Family Code.

(7) "Criminal prosecution" includes a proceeding under Title 3, Family Code.

(8) "Department" means the Department of Public Safety.

(9) "Director" means the public safety director of the department.

(10) "Driver's license" has the meaning assigned by Section 521.001. The term includes a commercial driver's license or a commercial learner's permit issued under Chapter 522.

(11) "Minor" means an individual under 21 years of age.

(12) "Public place" has the meaning assigned by Section 1.07(a), Penal Code.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 444, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1348 (S.B. 328), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 752 (H.B. 1888), Sec. 37, eff. January 1, 2016.

Sec. 524.002. RULES; APPLICATION OF ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE ACT. (a) The department and the State Office of Administrative Hearings shall adopt rules to administer this chapter.

(b) Chapter 2001, Government Code, applies to a proceeding under this chapter to the extent consistent with this chapter.

(c) The State Office of Administrative Hearings may adopt a rule that conflicts with Chapter 2001, Government Code, if a conflict is necessary to expedite the hearings process within the time required by this chapter and applicable federal funding guidelines.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER B. SUSPENSION DETERMINATION AND NOTICE

Sec. 524.011. OFFICER'S DUTIES FOR DRIVER'S LICENSE SUSPENSION. (a) An officer arresting a person shall comply with Subsection (b) if:

(1) the person is arrested for an offense under Section 49.04, 49.045, 49.06, or 49.061, Penal Code, or an offense under Section 49.07 or 49.08 of that code involving the operation of a motor vehicle or watercraft, submits to the taking of a specimen of breath or blood and an analysis of the specimen shows the person had an alcohol concentration of a level specified by Section 49.01(2)(B), Penal Code; or

(2) the person is a minor arrested for an offense under Section 106.041, Alcoholic Beverage Code, or Section 49.04, 49.045, 49.06, or 49.061, Penal Code, or an offense under Section 49.07 or 49.08, Penal Code, involving the operation of a motor vehicle or watercraft and:

(A) the minor is not requested to submit to the taking of a specimen; or

(B) the minor submits to the taking of a specimen and an analysis of the specimen shows that the minor had an alcohol concentration of greater than .00 but less than the level specified by Section 49.01(2)(B), Penal Code.

(b) A peace officer shall:

(1) serve or, if a specimen is taken and the analysis of the specimen is not returned to the arresting officer before the person is admitted to bail, released from custody, delivered as provided by Title 3, Family Code, or committed to jail, attempt to serve notice of driver's license suspension by delivering the notice to the arrested person; and

(2) send to the department not later than the fifth business day after the date of the arrest:

(A) a copy of the driver's license suspension notice; and

(B) a sworn report of information relevant to the arrest.

(c) The report required under Subsection (b)(2)(B) must:

(1) identify the arrested person;

(2) state the arresting officer's grounds for believing the person committed the offense;

(3) give the analysis of the specimen if any; and

(4) include a copy of the criminal complaint filed in the case, if any.

(d) A peace officer shall make the report on a form approved by the department and in the manner specified by the department.

(e) The department shall develop forms for the notice of driver's license suspension to be used by all state and local law enforcement agencies.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (H.B. 4528), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 609, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 444, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 20.0045, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1348 (S.B. 328), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (H.B. 4528), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (H.B. 4528), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 813 (H.B. 1163), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 524.012. DEPARTMENT'S DETERMINATION FOR DRIVER'S LICENSE SUSPENSION. (a) On receipt of a report under Section 524.011, if the officer did not serve a notice of suspension of driver's license at the time the results of the analysis of a breath or blood specimen were obtained, the department shall determine from the information in the report whether to suspend the person's driver's license.

(b) The department shall suspend the person's driver's license if the department determines that:

(1) the person had an alcohol concentration of a level specified by Section 49.01(2)(B), Penal Code, while operating a motor vehicle in a public place or while operating a watercraft; or

(2) the person was a minor on the date that the breath or blood specimen was obtained and had any detectable amount of alcohol in the minor's system while operating a motor vehicle in a public place or while operating a watercraft.

(c) The department may not suspend a person's driver's license if:

(1) the person is an adult and the analysis of the person's breath or blood specimen determined that the person had an alcohol concentration of a level below that specified by Section 49.01(2)(B), Penal Code, at the time the specimen was taken; or

(2) the person is a minor and the department does not determine that the minor had any detectable amount of alcohol in the minor's system when the minor was arrested.

(d) A determination under this section is final unless a hearing is requested under Section 524.031.

(e) A determination under this section:

(1) is a civil matter;

(2) is independent of and is not an estoppel to any matter in issue in an adjudication of a criminal charge arising from the occurrence that is the basis for the suspension; and

(3) does not preclude litigation of the same or similar facts in a criminal prosecution.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 30.102, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1348 (S.B. 328), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 524.013. NOTICE OF DEPARTMENT'S DETERMINATION. (a) If the department suspends a person's driver's license, the department shall send a notice of suspension by first class mail to the person's address:

(1) in the records of the department; or

(2) in the peace officer's report if it is different from the address in the department's records.

(b) Notice is considered received on the fifth day after the date the notice is mailed.

(c) If the department determines not to suspend a person's driver's license, the department shall notify the person of that determination and shall rescind any notice of driver's license suspension served on the person.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1409, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 524.014. NOTICE OF SUSPENSION. A notice of suspension under Section 524.013 must state:

(1) the reason and statutory grounds for the suspension;

(2) the effective date of the suspension;

(3) the right of the person to a hearing;

(4) how to request a hearing; and

(5) the period in which the person must request a hearing.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 524.015. EFFECT OF DISPOSITION OF CRIMINAL CHARGE ON DRIVER'S LICENSE SUSPENSION. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the disposition of a criminal charge does not affect a driver's license suspension under this chapter and does not bar any matter in issue in a driver's license suspension proceeding under this chapter.

(b) A suspension may not be imposed under this chapter on a person who is acquitted of a criminal charge under Section 49.04, 49.045, 49.06, 49.061, 49.07, or 49.08, Penal Code, or Section 106.041, Alcoholic Beverage Code, arising from the occurrence that was the basis for the suspension. If a suspension was imposed before the acquittal, the department shall rescind the suspension and shall remove any reference to the suspension from the person's computerized driving record.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1348 (S.B. 328), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 813 (H.B. 1163), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER C. SUSPENSION PROVISIONS

Sec. 524.021. SUSPENSION EFFECTIVE DATE. (a) A driver's license suspension under this chapter takes effect on the 40th day after the date the person:

(1) receives a notice of suspension under Section 524.011; or

(2) is presumed to have received notice of suspension under Section 524.013.

(b) A suspension under this chapter may not be probated.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 524.022. PERIOD OF SUSPENSION. (a) A period of suspension under this chapter for an adult is:

(1) 90 days if the person's driving record shows no alcohol-related or drug-related enforcement contact during the 10 years preceding the date of the person's arrest; or

(2) one year if the person's driving record shows one or more alcohol-related or drug-related enforcement contacts during the 10 years preceding the date of the person's arrest.

(b) A period of suspension under this chapter for a minor is:

(1) 60 days if the minor has not been previously convicted of an offense under Section 106.041, Alcoholic Beverage Code, or Section 49.04, 49.045, 49.06, or 49.061, Penal Code, or an offense under Section 49.07 or 49.08, Penal Code, involving the operation of a motor vehicle or a watercraft;

(2) 120 days if the minor has been previously convicted once of an offense listed by Subdivision (1); or

(3) 180 days if the minor has been previously convicted twice or more of an offense listed by Subdivision (1).

(c) For the purposes of determining whether a minor has been previously convicted of an offense described by Subsection (b)(1):

(1) an adjudication under Title 3, Family Code, that the minor engaged in conduct described by Subsection (b)(1) is considered a conviction under that provision; and

(2) an order of deferred adjudication for an offense alleged under a provision described by Subsection (b)(1) is considered a conviction of an offense under that provision.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 386 (H.B. 291), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 444, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1348 (S.B. 328), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 386 (H.B. 291), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 813 (H.B. 1163), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 524.023. APPLICATION OF SUSPENSION UNDER OTHER LAWS. (a) If a person is convicted of an offense under Section 106.041, Alcoholic Beverage Code, or Section 49.04, 49.045, 49.06, 49.061, 49.07, or 49.08, Penal Code, and if any conduct on which that conviction is based is a ground for a driver's license suspension under this chapter and Section 106.041, Alcoholic Beverage Code, Subchapter O, Chapter 521, or Subchapter H, Chapter 522, each of the suspensions shall be imposed.

(b) The court imposing a driver's license suspension under Section 106.041, Alcoholic Beverage Code, or Chapter 521 or 522 as required by Subsection (a) shall credit a period of suspension imposed under this chapter toward the period of suspension required under Section 106.041, Alcoholic Beverage Code, or Subchapter O, Chapter 521, or Subchapter H, Chapter 522, unless the person was convicted of an offense under Article 6701l-1, Revised Statutes, as that law existed before September 1, 1994, Section 19.05(a)(2), Penal Code, as that law existed before September 1, 1994, Section 49.04, 49.045, 49.06, 49.061, 49.07, or 49.08, Penal Code, or Section 106.041, Alcoholic Beverage Code, before the date of the conviction on which the suspension is based, in which event credit may not be given.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1348 (S.B. 328), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 813 (H.B. 1163), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER D. HEARING AND APPEAL

Sec. 524.031. HEARING REQUEST. If, not later than the 15th day after the date on which the person receives notice of suspension under Section 524.011 or is presumed to have received notice under Section 524.013, the department receives at its headquarters in Austin, in writing, including a facsimile transmission, or by another manner prescribed by the department, a request that a hearing be held, a hearing shall be held as provided by this subchapter.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 524.032. HEARING DATE; RESCHEDULING. (a) A hearing requested under this subchapter shall be held not earlier than the 11th day after the date on which the person requesting the hearing is notified of the hearing unless the parties agree to waive this requirement. The hearing shall be held before the effective date of the suspension.

(b) A hearing shall be rescheduled if, before the fifth day before the date scheduled for the hearing, a request for a continuance from the person who requested the hearing is received in accordance with the memorandum of understanding adopted under Section 524.033(c). Unless both parties agree otherwise, the hearing shall be rescheduled for a date not earlier than the fifth day after the date the request for continuance is received.

(c) A person who requests a hearing under this chapter may obtain only one continuance under this section unless the person shows that a medical condition prevents the person from attending the rescheduled hearing, in which event one additional continuance may be granted for a period not to exceed 10 days.

(d) A request for a hearing stays suspension of a person's driver's license until the date of the final decision of the administrative law judge.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 444, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 228 (H.B. 2154), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2016.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (H.B. 4528), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 524.033. STATE OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS. (a) A hearing under this subchapter shall be heard by an administrative law judge employed by the State Office of Administrative Hearings.

(b) The State Office of Administrative Hearings shall provide for the stenographic or electronic recording of the hearing.

(c) The department and chief administrative law judge of the State Office of Administrative Hearings shall adopt and at least biennially update a memorandum of understanding establishing that the State Office of Administrative Hearings has primary scheduling responsibility for a hearing under this subchapter. The memorandum of understanding must, at a minimum:

(1) set out the roles and responsibilities of the State Office of Administrative Hearings and the department in scheduling a hearing under this subchapter, including which agency is responsible for scheduling each stage of a hearing;

(2) ensure that the State Office of Administrative Hearings and the department have timely access to scheduling and continuance information; and

(3) provide for the transfer of funding for department employees responsible for scheduling hearings under this subchapter from the department to the State Office of Administrative Hearings when the State Office of Administrative Hearings assumes responsibility for initial scheduling of hearings under this subchapter.

(d) The State Office of Administrative Hearings and the department shall consult with the Department of Information Resources and the Office of Court Administration of the Texas Judicial System in developing any information technology solutions needed to complete the transfer of scheduling responsibilities, as outlined in the memorandum of understanding adopted under Subsection (c).

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 228 (H.B. 2154), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 524.034. HEARING LOCATION. A hearing under this subchapter shall be held:

(1) at a location designated by the State Office of Administrative Hearings:

(A) in the county of arrest if the arrest occurred in a county with a population of 300,000 or more; or

(B) in the county in which the person is alleged to have committed the offense for which the person was arrested or not more than 75 miles from the county seat of the county in which the person was arrested; or

(2) with the consent of the person and the department, by telephone conference call.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 524.035. HEARING. (a) The issues that must be proved at a hearing by a preponderance of the evidence are:

(1) whether:

(A) the person had an alcohol concentration of a level specified by Section 49.01(2)(B), Penal Code, while operating a motor vehicle in a public place or while operating a watercraft; or

(B) the person was a minor on the date that the breath or blood specimen was obtained and had any detectable amount of alcohol in the minor's system while operating a motor vehicle in a public place or while operating a watercraft; and

(2) whether reasonable suspicion to stop or probable cause to arrest the person existed.

(b) If the administrative law judge finds in the affirmative on each issue in Subsection (a), the suspension is sustained.

(c) If the administrative law judge does not find in the affirmative on each issue in Subsection (a), the department shall:

(1) reinstate the person's driver's license; and

(2) rescind an order prohibiting the issuance of a driver's license to the person.

(d) An administrative law judge may not find in the affirmative on the issue in Subsection (a)(1) if:

(1) the person is an adult and the analysis of the person's breath or blood determined that the person had an alcohol concentration of a level below that specified by Section 49.01, Penal Code, at the time the specimen was taken; or

(2) the person was a minor on the date that the breath or blood specimen was obtained and the administrative law judge does not find that the minor had any detectable amount of alcohol in the minor's system when the minor was arrested.

(e) The decision of the administrative law judge is final when issued and signed.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 444, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1348 (S.B. 328), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (H.B. 4528), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 524.036. FAILURE TO APPEAR. A person who requests a hearing and fails to appear without just cause waives the right to a hearing and the department's determination is final.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 524.037. CONTINUANCE. (a) A continuance under Section 524.032 stays the suspension of a driver's license until the date of the final decision of the administrative law judge.

(b) A suspension order may not go into effect pending a final decision of the administrative law judge as a result of a continuance granted under Section 524.039.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (H.B. 4528), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 444, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 766 (H.B. 4528), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 524.038. INSTRUMENT RELIABILITY AND ANALYSIS VALIDITY. (a) The reliability of an instrument used to take or analyze a specimen of a person's breath to determine alcohol concentration and the validity of the results of the analysis may be attested to in a proceeding under this subchapter by affidavit from the certified breath test technical supervisor responsible for maintaining and directing the operation of breath test instruments in compliance with department rule.

(b) An affidavit submitted under Subsection (a) must contain statements on:

(1) the reliability of the instrument and the analytical results; and

(2) compliance with state law in the administration of the program.

(c) An affidavit of an expert witness contesting the reliability of the instrument or the results is admissible.

(d) An affidavit from a person whose presence is timely requested under this section is inadmissible if the person fails to appear at a hearing without a showing of good cause. Otherwise, an affidavit under this section may be submitted in lieu of an appearance at the hearing by the breath test operator, breath test technical supervisor, or expert witness.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 524.039. APPEARANCE OF TECHNICIANS AT HEARING. (a) Not later than the fifth day before the date of a scheduled hearing, the person who requested a hearing may apply to the State Office of Administrative Hearings to issue a subpoena for the attendance of the breath test operator who took the specimen of the person's breath to determine alcohol concentration or the certified breath test technical supervisor responsible for maintaining and directing the operation of the breath test instrument used to analyze the specimen of the person's breath, or both. The State Office of Administrative Hearings shall issue the subpoena only on a showing of good cause.

(b) The department may reschedule a hearing once not less than 48 hours before the hearing if a person subpoenaed under Subsection (a) is unavailable. The department may also reschedule the hearing on showing good cause that a person subpoenaed under Subsection (a) is not available at the time of the hearing.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 3.01, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 524.040. NOTICE REQUIREMENTS. (a) Notice required to be provided by the department under this subchapter may be given by telephone or other electronic means. If notice is given by telephone or other electronic means, written notice must also be provided.

(b) Notice by mail is considered received on the fifth day after the date the notice is deposited with the United States Postal Service.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 524.041. APPEAL FROM ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING. (a) A person whose driver's license suspension is sustained may appeal the decision by filing a petition not later than the 30th day after the date the administrative law judge's decision is final. The administrative law judge's final decision is immediately appealable without the requirement of a motion for rehearing.

(b) A petition under Subsection (a) must be filed in a county court at law in the county in which the person was arrested or, if there is not a county court at law in the county, in the county court. If the county judge is not a licensed attorney, the county judge shall transfer the case to a district court for the county on the motion of either party or of the judge.

(c) A person who files an appeal under this section shall send a copy of the petition by certified mail to the department and to the State Office of Administrative Hearings at each agency's headquarters in Austin. The copy must be certified by the clerk of the court in which the petition is filed.

(d) The department's right to appeal is limited to issues of law.

(e) A district or county attorney may represent the department in an appeal.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 524.042. STAY OF SUSPENSION ON APPEAL. (a) A suspension of a driver's license under this chapter is stayed on the filing of an appeal petition only if:

(1) the person's driver's license has not been suspended as a result of an alcohol-related or drug-related enforcement contact during the five years preceding the date of the person's arrest; and

(2) the person has not been convicted during the 10 years preceding the date of the person's arrest of an offense under:

(A) Article 6701l-1, Revised Statutes, as that law existed before September 1, 1994;

(B) Section 19.05(a)(2), Penal Code, as that law existed before September 1, 1994;

(C) Section 49.04, 49.045, 49.06, or 49.061, Penal Code;

(D) Section 49.07 or 49.08, Penal Code, if the offense involved the operation of a motor vehicle or a watercraft; or

(E) Section 106.041, Alcoholic Beverage Code.

(b) A stay under this section is effective for not more than 90 days after the date the appeal petition is filed. On the expiration of the stay, the department shall impose the suspension. The department or court may not grant an extension of the stay or an additional stay.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 28, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1348 (S.B. 328), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 813 (H.B. 1163), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 524.043. REVIEW; ADDITIONAL EVIDENCE. (a) Review on appeal is on the record certified by the State Office of Administrative Hearings with no additional testimony.

(b) On appeal, a party may apply to the court to present additional evidence. If the court is satisfied that the additional evidence is material and that there were good reasons for the failure to present it in the proceeding before the administrative law judge, the court may order that the additional evidence be taken before an administrative law judge on conditions determined by the court.

(c) There is no right to a jury trial in an appeal under this section.

(d) An administrative law judge may change a finding or decision as to whether the person had an alcohol concentration of a level specified in Section 49.01, Penal Code, or whether a minor had any detectable amount of alcohol in the minor's system because of the additional evidence and shall file the additional evidence and any changes, new findings, or decisions with the reviewing court.

(e) A remand under this section does not stay the suspension of a driver's license.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 29, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 524.044. TRANSCRIPT OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARING. (a) To obtain a transcript of an administrative hearing, the party who appeals the administrative law judge's decision must apply to the State Office of Administrative Hearings.

(b) On payment of a fee not to exceed the actual cost of preparing the transcript, the State Office of Administrative Hearings shall promptly furnish both parties with a transcript of the administrative hearing.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER E. REINSTATEMENT AND REISSUANCE OF DRIVER'S LICENSE

Sec. 524.051. REINSTATEMENT AND REISSUANCE. (a) A driver's license suspended under this chapter may not be reinstated or another driver's license issued to the person until the person pays the department a fee of $125 in addition to any other fee required by law.

(b) The payment of a reinstatement fee is not required if a suspension under this chapter is:

(1) rescinded by the department; or

(2) not sustained by an administrative law judge, or a court.

(c) Each fee collected under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the Texas mobility fund.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 444, Sec. 14(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1325, Sec. 11.06, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.